Arkansas, session 2025, SB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Human Services - Division of Children and Family
Services for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N249N DHS DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) N016N DHS DEP DIR ADMINISTRATIVE SVCS 1 GRADE GS15
(3) N134N DHS/DCFS ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 4 GRADE GS14
*LCW016*
01/08/2025 3:10:24 PM LCW016

SB35
(4) N121N DHS/DCFS DEPUTY DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS14
(5) G101C DHS AREA MANAGER 10 GRADE GS12
(6) G027N DHS RESEARCH ANALYSIS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(7) G100C DHS COUNTY ADMINISTRATOR III 2 GRADE GS10
(8) E013C EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(9) G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 19 GRADE GS09
(10) M011C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER COUNTY SUPV 29 GRADE GS09
(11) M016C DHS FIELD MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(12) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 6 GRADE GS08
(13) M010C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER CLINICAL SPEC 26 GRADE GS08
(14) M015C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER SUPERVISOR 162 GRADE GS08
(15) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
(16) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(17) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(18) G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 11 GRADE GS07
(19) G267C DHS PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY ANALYST 2 GRADE GS07
(20) M027C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER SPECIALIST 670 GRADE GS07
(21) M040C FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(22) X095C QUALITY ASSURANCE ANALYST 3 GRADE GS07
(23) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 16 GRADE GS06
(24) G210C DHS PROGRAM SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS06
(25) M051C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER 40 GRADE GS06
(26) M066C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS06
(27) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 10 GRADE GS05
(28) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 26 GRADE GS04
(29) L078C FAMILY SERVICES ASSISTANT 6 GRADE GS04
(30) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(31) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(32) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
(33) M090C DHS PROGRAM ASSISTANT 338 GRADE GS03
(34) C062C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE ASST 17 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1,420

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Human Services - Division of Children and Family Services
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
01/08/2025 3:10:24 PM LCW016

SB35
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: sixty-five (65) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Human Services - Division of
Children and Family Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $62,586,466
(02) EXTRA HELP 1,231,570
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 27,002,960
(04) OVERTIME 5,061,305
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 17,191,660
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 39,011
(C) PROF. FEES 33,236,462
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 1,595,570
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $147,945,004

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - GRANTS - STATE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Children and Family Services Fund Account, for grant payments of the
Department of Human Services - Division of Children and Family Services -
Grants - State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
01/08/2025 3:10:24 PM LCW016

SB35
(01) FOSTER CARE $54,006,830
(02) STATE RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT 10,647,249
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $64,654,079

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - TANF - FOSTER CARE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
grant payments of the Department of Human Services - Division of Children and
Family Services - TANF - Foster Care for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FOSTER CARE $102,907,999

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT PREVENTION
OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human
Services, to be payable from the Children's Trust Fund, for operating
expenses and grants or loans for the development or operation of child abuse
prevention programs of the Department of Human Services - Division of
Children and Family Services - Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Board for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $17,770
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT PREVENTION
GRANT AND AID/LOANS 197,029
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $214,799

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - SAFE HARBOR GRANTS. There is hereby
01/08/2025 3:10:24 PM LCW016

SB35
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Safe Harbor Fund for Sexually Exploited Children, for grants to Children's
Advocacy Centers statewide for services and treatment for sexually exploited
children by the Department of Human Services - Division of Children and
Family Services - Safe Harbor Grants for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SAFE HARBOR GRANTS $50,000

SECTION 8. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 9. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 10. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
01/08/2025 3:10:24 PM LCW016

SB35
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.































01/08/2025 3:10:24 PM LCW016